Tennessee, session 114, SB2475.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-396, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(h) The commissioner of revenue shall report to the general assembly on an
annual basis, beginning July 1, 2027, the amount of refunds issued under this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2475
012625
- 1 -